Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-907
Exemptions from act.

The Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act does not prohibit the performance of the professional activities of a clinical nurse specialist by a person not holding a license issued under the act if performed:

(1) In an emergency situation;

(2) By a legally qualified person from another state employed by the United States and performing official duties in this state; or

(3) By a person enrolled in an approved clinical nurse specialist program for the education of clinical nurse specialists as part of that approved program.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,128;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 34;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 259.